North Dakota statutes. TITLE 43 Occupations and Professions
CHAPTER 43-28 Dentists

43-28-01.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter and chapter 43-20, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Accredited dental school” means a dental school, college, or university accredited by the commission on dental accreditation of the American dental association or its successor.

“Advertising” means to invite the attention of or give notice to the public, by any means, medium, or manner whatsoever of any fact, information, or data pertaining to or being conducive of the practice of dentistry in this state.

“Board” means the state board of dental examiners.

“Certificate of registration” means a written statement of the board declaring that a licensed dentist has paid the biennial registration fee required by this chapter.

“Dentist” means an individual who has a license to practice in this state and who holds a valid biennial certificate of registration.

“License” means the right, authority, or permission granted by the board to practice dentistry in this state.

“Practice of dentistry” means examination, diagnosis, treatment, repair, administration of local or general anesthetics, prescriptions, or surgery of or for any disease, disorder, deficiency, deformity, discoloration, condition, lesion, injury, or pain of the human oral cavity, teeth, gingivae, and soft tissues, and the diagnosis, surgical, and adjunctive treatment of the diseases, injuries, and defects of the upper and lower human jaw and associated structures.

“Telehealth” has the same meaning as in section 26.1-36-09.15.

Source:

S.L. 1959, ch. 319, § 1; 1971, ch. 443, § 1; 1993, ch. 54, § 106; 1995, ch. 409, §§ 5, 6; 2005, ch. 361, § 7; 2007, ch. 374, § 5; 2009, ch. 369, § 14; 2021, ch. 318, § 1, effective August 1, 2021.

Cross-References.

General applicability of chapter to dental hygienists, see N.D.C.C. § 43-20-11.

43-28-02.
Exceptions. [Effective through August 31, 2022]

The provisions of this chapter do not apply:

To the filling of written prescriptions of a licensed and registered dentist by any person for the construction, reproduction, or repair of prosthetic dentures, bridges, plates, or appliances, to be used or worn as substitutes for natural teeth, provided, that such person or legal entity may not solicit or advertise, directly or indirectly, by mail, card, newspaper, pamphlet, radio, television, or otherwise to the general public to construct, reproduce, repair prosthetic dentures, bridges, plates, or other appliances to be used or worn as substitutes for natural teeth.

To a student enrolled in and regularly attending any dental college, dental hygiene, or dental assisting program recognized as such by the board, if the student’s acts are done in the dental college, dental hygiene, or dental assisting program and under the direct supervision of the student’s instructor; or to a student who is in training in any dental program recognized as such by the board and who is continuing the student’s training and performing the duties of an extern under the supervision of a dentist who has received approval to supervise an externship by the appropriate accrediting committee, including the board.

To a legally qualified and licensed physician, surgeon, or other practitioner authorized by law, who in emergency cases performs any act within the scope of the practice of dentistry.

To a duly licensed and registered dentist of another state temporarily operating in this state as a clinician, lecturer, or attendant of an educational program under the auspices of a dental college, a reputable dental society, dental hygienist society, or dental assistant society.

To the practice of dentistry in the discharge of their official duties by graduate dentists or dental surgeons in the United States army, navy, air force, public health service, coast guard, veterans’ bureau, or director of the dental division of the state department of health.

To a registered nurse, licensed practical nurse, registered dental hygienist, or registered dental assistant who is applying topical fluoride varnish to an individual and is acting under the direct or general supervision of a physician or licensed dentist if the registered nurse, licensed practical nurse, registered dental hygienist, or registered dental assistant has successfully completed a training program approved by the board.

To an advanced practice registered nurse licensed under chapter 43-12.1 who is applying topical fluoride varnish to an individual and is acting within the scope of practice of the advanced practice registered nurse and has successfully completed a training program approved by the board.

To registered dental hygienists, registered dental assistants, qualified dental assistants, and dental assistants practicing within the scope of practice and under supervision as required by chapter 43-20 and by rule.

Source:

S.L. 1959, ch. 319, § 2; 1977, ch. 409, § 1; 1981, ch. 450, § 1; 1991, ch. 465, § 6; 1995, ch. 243, § 2; 2005, ch. 361, § 8; 2007, ch. 374, § 6; 2007, ch. 368, § 2; 2009, ch. 369, § 15.

Cross-References.

Dental hygienists, licensing, see N.D.C.C. ch. 43-20.

43-28-02.
Exceptions. [Effective September 1, 2022]

The provisions of this chapter do not apply:

To the filling of written prescriptions of a licensed and registered dentist by any person for the construction, reproduction, or repair of prosthetic dentures, bridges, plates, or appliances, to be used or worn as substitutes for natural teeth, provided, that such person or legal entity may not solicit or advertise, directly or indirectly, by mail, card, newspaper, pamphlet, radio, television, or otherwise to the general public to construct, reproduce, repair prosthetic dentures, bridges, plates, or other appliances to be used or worn as substitutes for natural teeth.

To a student enrolled in and regularly attending any dental college, dental hygiene, or dental assisting program recognized as such by the board, if the student’s acts are done in the dental college, dental hygiene, or dental assisting program and under the direct supervision of the student’s instructor; or to a student who is in training in any dental program recognized as such by the board and who is continuing the student’s training and performing the duties of an extern under the supervision of a dentist who has received approval to supervise an externship by the appropriate accrediting committee, including the board.

To a legally qualified and licensed physician, surgeon, or other practitioner authorized by law, who in emergency cases performs any act within the scope of the practice of dentistry.

To a duly licensed and registered dentist of another state temporarily operating in this state as a clinician, lecturer, or attendant of an educational program under the auspices of a dental college, a reputable dental society, dental hygienist society, or dental assistant society.

To the practice of dentistry in the discharge of their official duties by graduate dentists or dental surgeons in the United States army, navy, air force, public health service, coast guard, veterans’ bureau, or director of the dental division of the department of health and human services.

To a registered nurse, licensed practical nurse, registered dental hygienist, or registered dental assistant who is applying topical fluoride varnish to an individual and is acting under the direct or general supervision of a physician or licensed dentist if the registered nurse, licensed practical nurse, registered dental hygienist, or registered dental assistant has successfully completed a training program approved by the board.

To an advanced practice registered nurse licensed under chapter 43-12.1 who is applying topical fluoride varnish to an individual and is acting within the scope of practice of the advanced practice registered nurse and has successfully completed a training program approved by the board.

To registered dental hygienists, registered dental assistants, qualified dental assistants, and dental assistants practicing within the scope of practice and under supervision as required by chapter 43-20 and by rule.

Source:

S.L. 1959, ch. 319, § 2; 1977, ch. 409, § 1; 1981, ch. 450, § 1; 1991, ch. 465, § 6; 1995, ch. 243, § 2; 2005, ch. 361, § 8; 2007, ch. 374, § 6; 2007, ch. 368, § 2; 2009, ch. 369, § 15; 2021, ch. 352, § 362, effective September 1, 2022.

43-28-03.
State board of dental examiners — Members — Appointment — Terms of office — Oath — Vacancies.

The state board of dental examiners consists of nine members appointed by the governor. The membership of the board must include six dentist members, at least one of whom is a board-eligible or board-certified oral and maxillofacial surgeon; one dental hygienist member; one dental assistant member; and one independent consumer member. Appointment to the board is for a term of five years, with terms of office arranged so no more than two terms expire on March sixteenth of each year. Each member of the board shall hold office until a successor is appointed and qualified. An individual appointed to the board qualifies by taking the oath required of civil officers. A member may not serve more than ten years or two 5-year terms of office. If a member of the board is absent from two consecutive regular meetings, the board may declare a vacancy to exist. All vacancies on the board must be filled by the governor by appointment.

Source:

S.L. 1959, ch. 319, § 3; 1977, ch. 410, § 1; 1981, ch. 450, § 2; 1991, ch. 465, § 7; 2021, ch. 318, § 2, effective August 1, 2021.

Note.

Section 6 of chapter 318, S.L. 2021, provides: “

APPLICATION.

The governor shall appoint the members of the board for staggered terms so no more than two members' terms expire each year. Notwithstanding
section 43-28-03, a member appointed under this section may not serve more than two full five-year terms but may serve more than ten years.”

Cross-References.

Oath of civil officers, see N.D.C.C. § 44-01-05.

43-28-04.
Qualifications and appointment of members of the board — Limited vote.

An individual may not be appointed as a dentist member of the board unless that individual:

Is a dentist licensed and registered under this chapter; and

Is actively engaged in the practice of dentistry and has been so engaged in this state for at least five years immediately preceding the appointment.

An individual may not be appointed as the dental hygienist member of the board unless that individual:

Is a licensed and registered dental hygienist in accordance with chapter 43-20; and

Is actively engaged in the practice of dental hygiene and has been so engaged in this state for at least five years immediately preceding the dental hygienist’s appointment.

An individual may not be appointed as the dental assistant member of the board unless that individual:

Is a registered dental assistant in accordance with chapter 43-20; and

Is actively practicing as a registered dental assistant and has been so practicing in this state for at least five years immediately preceding the dental assistant’s appointment.

An individual may not be appointed as the independent consumer member of the board unless that individual:

Has been a resident of North Dakota for five years immediately preceding appointment;

Has no personal, family, or financial relationship with the dental profession; and

Is not a dentist, a dental hygienist, a dental assistant, a physician, a nurse, or the spouse of an individual engaged in any of those occupations.

The dental hygienist, dental assistant, and independent consumer member of the board shall exercise full voting privileges in all areas except that the dental hygienist may not participate in the clinical examination of dentists for licensure and the dental assistant and independent consumer member may not participate in the clinical examination of dentists or hygienists for licensure.

Source:

S.L. 1959, ch. 319, § 4; 1977, ch. 410, § 2; 1981, ch. 450, § 3; 1981, ch. 435, § 13; 1991, ch. 465, § 8; 1995, ch. 409, § 7; 2007, ch. 374, § 7; 2021, ch. 318, § 3, effective August 1, 2021.

43-28-05.
Meeting of board — Officers — Bond — Compensation of members — Quorum.

The board shall hold a regular annual meeting at a place designated by the board and special meetings when necessary. At the regular meeting of the board, the members shall elect from their number a president, a member who has at least two years remaining on that member’s term, president-elect, a member who has at least three years remaining on that member’s term, and a secretary-treasurer. The executive director shall furnish a bond in the amount fixed by the board. Each member of the board shall receive as compensation for each day actually engaged in the duties of the office per diem at a rate established by the board and reimbursement for expenses as provided in section 54-06-09 while attending meetings of the board. The executive director may be paid an annual salary in an amount determined by the board. Four members of the board constitute a quorum but a smaller number may adjourn from time to time.

Source:

S.L. 1959, ch. 319, § 5; 1971, ch. 443, § 2; 1979, ch. 468, § 2; 1981, ch. 445, § 4; 1981, ch. 450, § 4; 1991, ch. 465, § 9; 1995, ch. 409, § 8; 2001, ch. 380, § 7; 2007, ch. 374, § 8.

Cross-References.

Dental hygiene and practice thereof defined, see N.D.C.C. § 43-20-03.

43-28-06.
Powers of board.

The board may:

Adopt and enforce reasonable rules to govern its proceedings and to carry out this chapter.

Examine applicants for licenses or registration to practice dentistry, dental hygiene, or dental assisting in this state, either by direct examination or by accepting the results of national or regional dental testing services in which the board participates or which the board recognizes.

Issue, suspend, revoke, limit, cancel, restrict, and reinstate licenses to practice dentistry or dental hygiene and the biennial certificates of registration upon any grounds authorized by this chapter or rules adopted by the board.

Issue subpoenas to require the attendance of witnesses and the production of documentary evidence and may administer oaths. Any member or executive officer of the board may administer oaths to witnesses, or issue subpoenas, but all subpoenas so issued must be attested by the secretary who shall affix the seal of the board thereto.

Employ and compensate an executive director, attorneys, investigative staff, and clerical assistants and may perform any other duties imposed upon the board by this chapter.

Establish minimum continuing professional education requirements for dentists, dental hygienists, and dental assistants.

Enter an agreement with the same professional organization with which the North Dakota board of medicine has entered an agreement under subsection 6 of section 43-17-07.1.

Source:

S.L. 1959, ch. 319, § 6; 1985, ch. 487, § 1; 1991, ch. 465, § 10; 1995, ch. 409, § 9; 2005, ch. 361, § 9; 2009, ch. 369, § 16; 2013, ch. 328, §§ 3, 4; 2015, ch. 297, § 34, effective August 1, 2015.

Cross-References.

Administrative Agencies Practice Act, see N.D.C.C. ch. 28-32.

43-28-07.
Expenses of board — How paid — Funds held by secretary-treasurer. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1971, ch. 510, § 15.

43-28-08.
Records of board — Use as evidence.

The board shall keep full and complete minutes of its proceedings and of its receipts and disbursements and a full and accurate list of all persons licensed and registered by it. The records of the board, together with the list of all licensed and registered dentists, are public records and must be open to public inspection at all reasonable times. Such records, or a transcript of the same or any part thereof, under the seal of the board, duly certified by its secretary-treasurer, are competent evidence of the facts therein stated. A certificate of the secretary-treasurer under the seal of the board stating that any person is or is not a duly licensed and registered dentist is prima facie evidence of such fact.

Source:

S.L. 1959, ch. 319, § 8.

Cross-References.

Admissibility of public records, see N.D.R.Ev. 1005.

43-28-09.
Biennial report.

The board may submit a report to the governor and the secretary of state in accordance with section 54-06-04.

Source:

S.L. 1959, ch. 319, § 9; 1963, ch. 346, § 46; 1973, ch. 403, § 35; 1975, ch. 466, § 37; 1995, ch. 350, § 36.

43-28-10.
License and certificate required — Scope of practice.

A person may not practice dentistry in this state unless that person is a dentist.

Source:

S.L. 1959, ch. 319, § 10; 2005, ch. 361, § 10; 2007, ch. 374, § 10; 2009, ch. 369, § 17.

Cross-References.

Dentist not required to be licensed as physician, see N.D.C.C. § 43-17-02.

Collateral References.

Dental hygienists, constitutionality, construction, and application of statute regulating, 11 A.L.R.2d 724.

Constitutionality and construction of statutes or regulations prohibiting one who has no license to practice dentistry from owning, maintaining, or operating an office therefor, 20 A.L.R.2d 808.

Regulation of prosthetic dentistry, 45 A.L.R.2d 1243.

Single or isolated transaction as falling within provisions of licensing requirements, 93 A.L.R.2d 90, 129.

Continuing or separate offense, practicing medicine, surgery, dentistry, optometry, podiatry or other healing arts without license as, 99 A.L.R.2d 654.

Partnership: validity and construction of contractual restrictions on right of medical practitioner to practice, incident to partnership agreement, 62 A.L.R.3d 970.

43-28-10.1.
Requirements for licensure.

The board may grant a license to practice dentistry to an applicant who has met all of the following requirements:

The applicant has a doctorate of dental surgery or doctorate of dental medicine degree from an accredited dental school.

The applicant has passed the examination administered by the joint commission on national dental examinations or the national dental examining board of Canada.

The applicant has passed a clinical competency examination administered by a regional dental testing service approved by the board by rule.

The applicant has passed, within one year of making application, a written examination on the laws and rules governing the practice of dentistry in this state.

Grounds for denial of the application under section 43-28-18 do not exist.

The applicant has met any requirement for licensure established by the board by rule.

Source:

S.L. 2009, ch. 369, § 19; 2013, ch. 328, § 5.

43-28-11.
Application — Fees.

An individual seeking to practice dentistry in this state shall apply to the executive director of the board on forms prescribed by the board. The application must be verified under oath to the effect that all of the statements contained in the application are true of the applicant’s own knowledge, and must be received by the executive director of the board at least thirty days before the board meeting at which it is considered. The applicant shall enclose with the application a recent autographed picture of the applicant and an application fee as determined by the board by rule.

Source:

S.L. 1959, ch. 319, § 11; 1971, ch. 443, § 4; 1981, ch. 445, § 5; 1981, ch. 435, § 14; 1985, ch. 487, § 2; 1991, ch. 465, § 11; 1995, ch. 409, § 10; 2007, ch. 374, § 11; 2009, ch. 369, § 18.

43-28-11.1.
Conviction not bar to licensure — Exceptions.

Conviction of an offense does not disqualify a person from licensure under this chapter unless the board determines that the offense has a direct bearing upon a person’s ability to serve the public as a dentist, or that, following conviction of any offense, the person is not sufficiently rehabilitated under section 12.1-33-02.1.

Source:

S.L. 1977, ch. 130, § 47.

Cross-References.

Definition of offense, see N.D.C.C. § 12.1-01-04.

43-28-11.2.
Fitness — Criminal history record check — Costs.

The board may investigate an applicant’s or a dentist’s fitness, qualification, and previous professional record and performance. The board may seek information sought under this section from recognized data sources, including the national practitioners data bank, data repositories, licensing and disciplinary authorities of other jurisdictions, professional education and training institutions, liability insurers, health care institutions, and law enforcement agencies. An applicant or a dentist for whom the board is performing an investigation under this section shall cooperate with the board if necessary to access the information sought by the board. The board or the board’s investigative disciplinary panels may require an applicant or a dentist who is the subject of a disciplinary investigation to submit to a statewide and nationwide criminal history record check. The criminal history record check must be conducted in the manner provided by section 12-60-24. All costs associated with a criminal history record check performed under this section are the responsibility of the dentist or applicant.

Source:

S.L. 2007, ch. 374, § 9.

43-28-11.3.
Standard of care and professional ethics — Telehealth.

A dentist is held to the same standard of care and ethical standards, whether practicing traditional in-person dentistry or telehealth. The following apply in the context of telehealth:

Professional ethical standards require a dentist to practice only in areas in which the dentist has demonstrated competence, based on the dentist’s training, ability, and experience.

A dentist may not practice telehealth unless a bona fide dentist-patient relationship is established in person or through telehealth. A dentist practicing telehealth shall verify the identity of the patient seeking care and shall disclose to the patient the dentist’s identity, physical location, contact information, and licensure status.

Before a dentist initially diagnoses or treats a patient for a specific illness, disease, or condition, the dentist shall perform an examination or evaluation. A dentist may perform an examination or evaluation entirely through telehealth if the examination or evaluation may be performed in accordance with the standard of care required for an in-person dental examination or evaluation. A dentist may not use telehealth to perform an initial examination or evaluation in circumstances in which the standard of care necessitates an in-person dental examination.

An appropriate telehealth examination or evaluation may include an examination utilizing secure videoconferencing in conjunction with store-and-forward technology or appropriate diagnostic testing that would be required during an in-person examination or evaluation or an examination conducted with an appropriately licensed intervening dental health care provider, practicing within the scope of the dental health care provider’s profession, providing necessary physical findings to the dentist during a live, two-way telehealth encounter. An examination or evaluation consisting only of a static online questionnaire or an audio conversation does not meet the standard of care.

The use of telehealth does not expand the scope of practice for a dental health care provider, and may not be used to circumvent the licensure requirements established for dental health care providers in this state.

A dentist who practices telehealth in this state must have adequate knowledge of the availability and location of local dentists and dental health care providers to provide followup care to a patient following a dental telehealth encounter, including emergent and acute care facilities, in order to enable a patient to receive followup care. Once a dentist conducts an appropriate examination or evaluation, whether in-person or by telehealth, and establishes a patient-dentist relationship, subsequent followup care may be provided as deemed appropriate by the treating dentist, or by another dentist licensed by the board designated by the treating dentist to act temporarily in the treating dentist’s absence.

A dentist practicing telehealth is subject to all North Dakota laws governing the adequacy of dental records and the provision of dental records to the patient and other dental health care providers treating the patient.

A dentist practicing telehealth must have procedures for providing in-person services or for the referral of a patient requiring dental services that cannot be provided by telehealth to another dentist who practices in the area of the state and the patient can readily access.

Source:

S.L. 2021, ch. 318, § 4, effective August 1, 2021.

43-28-12.
Examination — Subjects covered. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 369, § 31.

43-28-12.1.
Regional or other states’ examination. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 369, § 31.

43-28-12.2.
Continuing educational requirement for dentists — Audit. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 369, § 31.

43-28-13.
When re-examination required.

Any dentist who does not undertake the actual practice of dentistry within five years from the date of the dentist’s license and registration, shall, before engaging in the practice of dentistry in this state, notify the board of the intention in writing. The board, after a full investigation, may re-examine the dentist as to the dentist’s qualifications to practice dentistry in this state, if the board deems such re-examination necessary. The failure of the dentist to give the written notice to the board before engaging in the practice of dentistry in this state is grounds for disciplinary action.

Source:

S.L. 1959, ch. 319, § 13; 1971, ch. 443, § 8; 2009, ch. 369, § 21.

43-28-14.
Reexamination — Fee — Additional education. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 369, § 31.

43-28-15.
Licensure by credential review.

The board may issue a license and certificate of registration to practice dentistry in this state to an applicant who meets all of the following requirements:

The applicant, for at least five years immediately preceding application, has been licensed in good standing and has been actively practicing dentistry in another jurisdiction where the requirements are at least substantially equivalent to those of this state.

Grounds for denial of the application under section 43-28-18 do not exist.

The applicant pays to the board the fee determined by the board by rule.

The applicant delivers to the board a certificate from the examining or licensing board of every jurisdiction in which the individual is practicing or is licensed to practice, certifying that the individual is a licensed and registered dentist in good standing in that jurisdiction.

The applicant passes a written examination on the laws and rules governing the practice of dentistry in this state administered by the board at a meeting.

The applicant meets any requirement for licensure established by the board by rule.

Source:

S.L. 1959, ch. 319, § 15; 1971, ch. 443, § 9; 1981, ch. 445, § 8; 1991, ch. 465, § 16; 1993, ch. 431, § 6; 1995, ch. 409, § 12; 2007, ch. 374, § 12; 2009, ch. 369, § 22.

43-28-16.
Certificate — Displayed in place of business.

The holder of a license and certificate of registration shall display the license and certificate conspicuously in the holder’s place of business.

Source:

S.L. 1959, ch. 319, § 16; 1971, ch. 443, § 10; 1981, ch. 445, § 9; 1985, ch. 487, § 6; 1991, ch. 465, § 17; 2001, ch. 380, § 9; 2009, ch. 369, § 23.

43-28-16.1.
Death certificate issuance by dentist.

Any dentist licensed and registered may issue a death certificate in an emergency, when the cause of death is known to the dentist.

Source:

S.L. 1959, ch. 319, § 10.

43-28-16.2.
License renewals.

Licenses expire on December thirty-first of every odd-numbered year.

Licenses may be renewed by December thirty-first of the odd-numbered year by submitting a renewal application, a renewal fee established by the board by rule, and proof of completion of the continuing education requirements established by the board by rule, provided the dentist’s license is not revoked or grounds for denial under section 43-28-18 do not exist.

If the renewal application, renewal fee, and proof of completion of continuing education are not received by December thirty-first of the odd-numbered year, the license expires and the dentist may not practice dentistry.

Within sixty days after December thirty-first of the odd-numbered year, an expired license may be renewed by submitting the renewal application, renewal fee, proof of completion of continuing education, and a late fee established by the board by rule.

If the renewal application, renewal fee, proof of completion of continuing education, and late fee are not received within sixty days after December thirty-first of the odd-numbered year, the license may not be renewed, and the dentist must apply for and meet the requirements for licensure to be granted a license.

The board may extend the renewal deadlines for a dentist providing proof of medical or other hardship rendering the dentist unable to meet the deadline.

Source:

S.L. 2009, ch. 369, § 20.

43-28-17.
Inactive status.

Upon payment of a fee determined by the board, a dentist may request to have the dentist’s license placed on inactive status. While on inactive status, the dentist may not engage in the practice of dentistry in the state until the dentist applies for reinstatement, pays a renewal fee, and meets any additional requirements established by rule.

Source:

S.L. 1959, ch. 319, § 17; 1979, ch. 468, § 4; 1981, ch. 445, § 10; 1985, ch. 487, § 7; 1991, ch. 465, § 18; 2001, ch. 380, § 10; 2005, ch. 361, § 12; 2007, ch. 374, § 13; 2009, ch. 369, § 24.

43-28-18.
Grounds for denial of or disciplinary action against license and certificate.

The board may deny an application or take disciplinary action against the license and the certificate of registration of any applicant or dentist who has:

Engaged in dishonorable, unprofessional, or immoral conduct.

Been convicted of an offense determined by the board to have a direct bearing upon the individual’s ability to serve the public as a dentist, or the board determines, following conviction for any offense, that the individual is not sufficiently rehabilitated under section 12.1-33-02.1.

Been adjudged mentally ill and not judicially restored by the regularly constituted authorities.

Abused, is dependent on, or addicted to the use of alcohol or drugs.

Employed or permitted an unlicensed individual to practice dentistry in the office under the dentist’s control.

Been grossly negligent in the practice of dentistry.

Engaged in fraud or deceit in obtaining the license or in the practice of dentistry.

Disclosed confidential information.

Shared any professional fee with anyone or paid anyone for sending or referring patients to the dentist. However, this does not prohibit dentists from practicing in a partnership and sharing one another’s professional fees, nor prohibit a dentist from employing any other dentist or dental hygienist.

Used any advertising of any character tending to mislead and deceive the public, including advertising the public could reasonably interpret as indicating the dentist is qualified to practice a dental specialty, if the practice of that dental specialty would be outside the scope of practice for which the dentist is qualified to practice.

Failed to meet minimum standards of professional competence.

Prescribed, administered, or dispensed medications for reasons or conditions outside the scope of dental practice.

Fraudulently, carelessly, negligently, or inappropriately prescribed drugs or medications.

Directed others to perform acts or provide dental services for which they were not licensed or qualified or were prohibited by law or rule from performing or providing.

Submitted fraudulent insurance claims.

Made any false or untrue statements in an application for an examination to obtain a license to practice dentistry.

Made any false representations that the individual is the holder of a license or certificate of registration to practice dentistry.

Made any false claims that the individual is a graduate of a dental college or the holder of any diploma or degree from a dental college.

Failed to comply with commonly accepted national infection control guidelines and standards.

Abandoned the dentist’s practice in violation of rules adopted by the board.

Failed to report to the board as required under section 43-28-18.1.

Failed to practice within the scope of that dentist’s education or advanced training as recognized by the board, the American dental association, or other professional entity recognized by the board.

Failed to release copies of dental or medical records requested by a patient of record or violated section 23-12-14. Dental records may include any document, charting, study models, doctor’s notations, billing information, insurance document or combination of documents that pertains to a patient’s medical history, diagnosis, prognosis, or medical condition, which is generated and maintained in the process of the patient’s dental health care treatment.

Advised or directed patients to dental laboratories or dental laboratory technicians for any dental service or advised or directed patients to deal directly with laboratories or dental laboratory technicians without first having furnished the dental laboratory or dental laboratory technician a written prescription.

Worked or cooperated with dental laboratories that advertise for public patronage by delegating work to such laboratories in return for the referral of laboratory patrons for professional services.

Used the services of a person or entity not licensed to practice dentistry in this state, or constructed, altered, repaired, or duplicated a denture, plate, partial plate, bridge, splint, or orthodontic or prosthetic appliance, except as provided by rule adopted by the board.

Violated the code of ethics adopted by the board by rule.

Violated this chapter or rules adopted by the board.

Had the applicant’s or dentist’s license suspended, revoked, or disciplined in another jurisdiction.

Source:

S.L. 1959, ch. 319, § 18; 1977, ch. 130, § 48; 1981, ch. 445, § 11; 1981, ch. 435, § 15; 1991, ch. 465, § 19; 1993, ch. 431, § 7; 2005, ch. 361, § 13; 2007, ch. 374, § 15; 2009, ch. 369, § 25.

Cross-References.

Administrative Agencies Practice Act, see N.D.C.C. ch. 28-32.

Definition of offense, see N.D.C.C. § 12.1-01-04.

Dental hygienists, permitting activities in violation of licensing chapter as ground for suspension or revocation of dentist’s license, see N.D.C.C. § 43-20-05.

Failure to give notice of return to practice as grounds for discipline, see N.D.C.C. § 43-28-13.

Collateral References.

Regulation of prosthetic dentistry, 45 A.L.R.2d 1243.

Nolo contendere or non vult, statute authorizing revocation of license upon conviction as applicable to conviction based on plea of, 89 A.L.R.2d 540.

Validity and construction of statute or ordinance requiring or prohibiting posting or other publication of price of commodity or services, 89 A.L.R.2d 901.

Alcoholism, narcotics addiction, or misconduct with respect to alcoholic beverages or narcotics, as ground for revocation or suspension of license to practice medicine or dentistry, 93 A.L.R.2d 1398.

False claims, reports or bills for services in personal injury litigation, revocation or suspension of dentist’s license for, 95 A.L.R.2d 873.

Disqualification, for bias or interest, of member of occupation or profession sitting in license revocation proceeding, 97 A.L.R.2d 1210.

Professional incompetency as ground for disciplinary measure against physician or dentist, 28 A.L.R.3d 487.

Malicious prosecution predicated upon prosecution, institution or instigation of disciplinary proceeding against member of medical or allied profession, 39 A.L.R.3d 473.

Partnership: validity and construction of contractual restrictions on right of medical practitioner to practice, incident to partnership agreement, 62 A.L.R.3d 970.

Improper or immoral sexually related conduct toward patient as ground for disciplinary action against physician, dentist, or other licensed healer, 59 A.L.R.4th 1104.

Filing of false insurance claims for medical services as ground for disciplinary action against dentist, physician, or other medical practitioner, 70 A.L.R.4th 132.

Necessity of expert evidence in proceeding for revocation or suspension of license of physician, surgeon or dentist, 74 A.L.R.4th 969.

Liability of orthodontist for malpractice, 81 A.L.R.4th 632.

Wrongful or Excessive Prescription of Drugs as Ground for Revocation or Suspension of Physician’s or Dentist’s License to Practice. 19 A.L.R.6th 577.

43-28-18.1.
Duty to report.

A dentist shall report to the board in writing within sixty days of the event any illegal, unethical, or errant behavior or conduct of the dentist, including the following events, proceedings, or formal or informal actions:

A dental malpractice judgment or malpractice settlement or a final judgment by a court in favor of any party and against the licensee.

A final disposition regarding the surrender of a license, or adverse action taken against a license by a licensing agency in another state, territory, or country; a governmental agency; a law enforcement agency; or a court for an act or conduct that would constitute grounds for discipline under this chapter.

A mortality or other incident occurring in an outpatient facility of the dentist which results in temporary or permanent physical or mental injury requiring hospitalization of the patient during or as a direct result of a dental procedure or related use of general anesthesia, deep sedation, conscious sedation with a parenteral drug, or enteral sedation.

A dentist shall advise the board in a timely manner if the dentist reasonably believes another dentist has committed an illegal or immoral act or has otherwise failed to make a report as required under subsection 1.

Source:

S.L. 2007, ch. 374, § 14; 2009, ch. 369, § 26.